Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-1012
Trust deed; default; reinstatement; recorded notice of default; cancellation; costs and expenses.

(1) Whenever all or a portion of the principal sum of any obligation secured by a trust deed has, prior to the maturity date fixed in such obligation, become due or been declared due by reason of a breach or default in the performance of any obligation secured by the trust deed, including a default in the payment of interest or of any installment of principal, or by reason of failure of the trustor to pay, in accordance with the terms of such trust deed, taxes, assessments, premiums for insurance, or advances made by the beneficiary in accordance with terms of such obligation or of such trust deed, the trustor or his or her successor in interest in the trust property or any part thereof or any other person having a subordinate lien or encumbrance of record thereon or any beneficiary under a subordinate trust deed, at any time within one month, or within two months if the notice of default is subject to subdivision (1)(b)(i) of section 76-1006, of the filing for record of notice of default under such trust deed, if the power of sale is to be exercised, may pay to the beneficiary or his or her successor in interest the entire amount then due under the terms of such trust deed and the obligation secured thereby, including costs and expenses actually incurred in enforcing the terms of such obligation, or trust deed, and the trustee's fees actually incurred not exceeding in the aggregate fifty dollars or one-half of one percent of the entire unpaid principal sum secured, whichever is greater, other than such portion of the principal as would not then be due had no default occurred, and thereby cure the default theretofore existing and thereupon all proceedings theretofore had or instituted shall be dismissed or discontinued, and the obligation and trust deed shall be reinstated and shall be and remain in force and effect the same as if no acceleration had occurred. If the default is cured and the trust deed reinstated in the manner provided in this section, the beneficiary, or his or her assignee, shall, on demand of any person having an interest in the trust property, execute and deliver to him or her a request to the trustee that the trustee execute, acknowledge, and deliver a cancellation of the recorded notice of default under such trust deed, and any beneficiary under a trust deed, or his or her assignee, who, for a period of thirty days after such demand, refuses to request the trustee to execute and deliver such cancellation shall be liable to the person entitled to such request for all damages resulting from such refusal. A cancellation of recorded notice of default under a trust deed shall, when acknowledged, be entitled to be recorded and shall be sufficient if made and executed by the trustee in substantially the following form:

Cancellation of Notice of Default

The undersigned hereby cancels the notice of default filed for record ......., 20...., and recorded in book ........., page ......, (or computer system reference ..........) Records of ............ County, Nebraska, which notice of default refers to the trust deed executed by ............ as trustor, in which ............ is named as beneficiary and ........... as trustee, and filed for record ............, 20...., and recorded in book .........., page ......, (or computer system reference ..........) Records of ............ County, Nebraska.

Signature of trustee or attorney for trustee ..................................................

(2) Whenever all or a portion of the principal sum of any obligation secured by a trust deed has, prior to the maturity date fixed in such obligation, become due or been declared due by reason of a breach or default in the performance of any obligation secured by the trust deed, including a default in the payment of interest or of any installment of principal, or by reason of failure of the trustor to pay, in accordance with the terms of such trust deed, taxes, assessments, premiums for insurance, or advances made by the beneficiary in accordance with terms of such obligation or of such trust deed, in the event the trustor or his or her successor in interest or any other person having a subordinate lien or encumbrance of record thereon or any beneficiary under a subordinate trust deed makes payment of the entire amount then due under the terms of such trust deed and the obligation secured thereby at any time subsequent to the breach or default and prior to the sale of the trust property under section 76-1010, the beneficiary shall be allowed to collect the costs and expenses actually incurred in enforcing the terms of such obligation, or trust deed, including the trustee's fees, costs, and expenses actually incurred, not to exceed the amount provided in the trust deed or the obligation secured thereby.

Laws 1965, c. 451, § 12, p. 1430;

Laws 1969, c. 621, § 1, p. 2509;

Laws 1986, LB 999, § 6;

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 19;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 31;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 47;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 55;

Laws 2015, LB151, § 3.
August 30, 2015